apertium-kan.kan.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Kannada

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>	  ! Noun
%<v%>     ! Verb
%<nom%>   ! Nominal
%<dat%>   ! Dative
%<gen%>   ! Genitive
%<voc%>   ! Vocative
%<acc%>   ! Accusative
%<ins%>   ! Instrumental
%<loc%>   ! Locative
%<adj%>   ! Adjective
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<det%>   ! Determiner
%<cnjcoo%>! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>!	Sub-conj
%<adv%>   ! Adverb
%<post%>   ! Postposition
%<pr%> 		! Preposition
%<np%>    ! Proper noun
%<vaux%>  ! Auxiallary verb
%<num%>   ! Numeral
%<ord%>   ! Ordinal
%<part%>   ! Particle
%<inj%> 	  ! Interjection	
%<ques%> 	  ! Question

! Pronoun Types

%<prox%>  ! Proximate
%<dist%>  ! Distal
%<refl%>   ! Reflexive
%<cog%>   ! Cognomen 
%<hyd%>   ! Cognomen  ()
%<org%>   ! Organisation
%<ind%>   ! Indefinite
%<def%>   ! definite
%<interr%> !Interrogative
%<hon%> !Honorific
%<abbr%> !Abbreviation

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<sp%>  ! Singular or Plural

! Gender
%<m%>  ! Male
%<f%>  ! Female
%<nt%> ! Neutral
%<mf%> ! Male and Female
%<mfn%>! Male,Female and neutral


! Tense
%<pres%> ! Present
%<past%> ! Past
%<neg%>  ! Negative
%<pprs%> ! Present participle 
%<pri%>  ! Present indicative
%<pp%> 	 ! Past indicative
%<rel%>  ! Relative
%<cause%>!	Causitive
%<pass%>!	Passive
%<opt%>!	Optative
%<pot%>!	Potential
%<imp%>!	imperaitive
%<nimp%>!	Negative imperaitive
%<vpt%>!	verbal Participle
%<apt%>!	adjective Participle


!Person
%<p1%> ! 1st Person
%<p2%> ! 2nd Person
%<p3%> ! 3rd Person

!Proper Nouns
%<ant%> ! Anthroponym
%<top%> ! Toponym
%<acr%> ! Acronym
%<al%>  ! Alternate/Others 

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%+

! Punctuation
%<perc%>   	  ! Percent
%<eng%>   	  ! English
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot;


LEXICON ಮನೆ__n!house

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಯೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಗಳೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ಯನ್ನೇ #;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ  #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ #;!ಮೇಲ್ಮೈನ
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ಯಲ್ಲೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿನ # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ #;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದಾಗಿ #;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:ೆ #;!?

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%+ಮೇಲೆ%<adv%>:ಮೇಲೆ #;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ide__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ ide__vaux;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲ ide__vaux;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;			!might need to split
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ aagi__com;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಪಡು__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ulla ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:Golisu__v ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ varege__postpos;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sp%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ loo;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿಯೇ #;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ untu;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ odane ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ondige2 ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ kaarana ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ olage ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sp%>%<ins%>%<emph%>:ಯಿಂದಲೇ #;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:pade ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:kondu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ ashtu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ endare__part;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit;



%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:yattu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%+ಅನುಭವಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗಳನ್ನನುಭವಿಸಲ oo__inc_clit;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ endare__part ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ illa ;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಪಡು__vaux;



LEXICON yattu
%+ಯತ್ತು%<adv%>:ಯತ್ತ loo;

LEXICON pade
%+ಪಡೆ%<v%>:ಪಡೆಯ loo;


LEXICON olage
%+ಒಳಗೆ%<post%>:ೊಳಗೆ #;

LEXICON kaarana
%+ಕಾರಣ%<cnjsub%>:ಕಾರಣ #;
%+ಕಾರಣ%<cnjsub%>:ಕಾರಣ d__inda;

LEXICON ವಿದೇಶೀ__n			!Same as Mane,but diff gender !videshi
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗಾಗಿ __emph ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗಾಗಿಯ o-clit ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;!
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಯರ # ;!
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ # ;!
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #; 
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sp%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ #;!
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sp%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;!

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ulla ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:parti ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;




LEXICON ಗುರು__n
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ವಿನ # ;

%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ aagi__com ;


LEXICON ದೊರೆ__n!dore
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ # ;

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: aagi__com ;



LEXICON negation
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<adv%>%<neg%>:ಿಲ್ಲದೆ #;!ದೆ split more?

LEXICON negation2
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<adv%>%<pres%>%<neg%>:ವಿಲ್ಲ #;
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<adv%>%<neg%>:ವಿಲ್ಲದೆ #;!ದೆ split more?
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<adv%>%<neg%>:ವಿಲ್ಲದೆಯ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON illa		!illa
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<part%>%<neg%>:ಿಲ್ಲ #;
+ಇಲ್ಲ%<part%>%<neg%>:ಲಿಲ್ಲ #;

LEXICON Aagale
+ಆಗಲೇ%<adv%>:ಿಗಾಗಲೇ #;

LEXICON NounRoot
ವಾಹಕ:ವಾಹಕ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವಿದೇಶಿ:ವಿದೇಶಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವಿಜ್ಞಾನಿ:ವಿಜ್ಞಾನಿ  				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ವಿರೋಧಿ:ವಿರೋಧಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ಸಮಾಜವಾದಿ:ಸಮಾಜವಾದಿ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಅಧಿಕಾರಿ:ಅಧಿಕಾರಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವಿದೇಶೀ:ವಿದೇಶೀ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ರೋಗಿ:ರೋಗಿ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ನಿವಾಸಿ:ನಿವಾಸಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಪ್ರಧಾನಿ:ಪ್ರಧಾನಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಅತಿಥಿ:ಅತಿಥಿ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಅಭಿಮಾನಿ:ಅಭಿಮಾನಿ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವಿದ್ಯಾರ್ಥಿ:ವಿದ್ಯಾರ್ಥಿ    		ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವ್ಯಾಪಾರಿ:ವ್ಯಾಪಾರಿ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಮುಖ್ಯಮಂತ್ರಿ:ಮುಖ್ಯಮಂತ್ರಿ		ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಸಂಬಂಧಿ:ಸಂಬಂಧಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವ್ಯಕ್ತಿ:ವ್ಯಕ್ತಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ದ್ರೋಹಿ:ದ್ರೋಹಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ನಿರಪರಾಧಿ:ನಿರಪರಾಧಿ					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ದೋಷಿ:ದೋಷಿ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಮಾತಾಪಿತೃ:ಮಾತಾಪಿತೃ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ವ್ಯಾಪಾರೀ:ವ್ಯಾಪಾರೀ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಸ್ವದೇಶಿ:ಸ್ವದೇಶಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಶತ್ರು:ಶತ್ರು						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಚೀನಿ:ಚೀನಿ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ಸ್ವಾಮಿ:ಸ್ವಾಮಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ಸಿಬ್ಬಂದಿ:ಸಿಬ್ಬಂದಿ 				ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ಭಕ್ತಾದಿ:ಭಕ್ತಾದಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಜಪಾನಿ:ಜಪಾನಿ 						ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಹಿಂದುಸ್ತಾನಿ:ಹಿಂದುಸ್ತಾನಿ 			ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಪರವಾನಗಿ:ಪರವಾನಗಿ 					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n;
ಎದುರಾಳಿ:ಎದುರಾಳಿ					ವಿದೇಶೀ__n; 
ಗುರು:ಗುರು 						ಗುರು__n;
ಗಂಡು:ಗಂಡು						ಗುರು__n;
ಸ್ವಾಮಿ:ಸ್ವಾಮಿ 					ಗುರು__n;
ವಸ್ತು:ವಸ್ತು 						ಗುರು__n;
ಅಧಿಕಾರಿ:ಅಧಿಕಾರಿ 					ಗುರು__n;
